Maryland, session 2026, HB1582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–203.
(c) (1) National standardized testing may not be the only measure for
evaluating educational accountability.
(2) (i) An educational accountability program shall include at least
three school quality indicators that measure the comparative opportunities provided to
students or the level of student success in public schools.
(ii) 1. One of the school quality indicators under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph shall be school climate surveys.
2. The school climate surveys shall include at least one
question to educators regarding the receipt of critical instructional feedback.
(iii) Other school quality indicators may include:
1. Class size;
2. Case load;
– 1 –

Ch. 593 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. Opportunities for:
A. Advanced Placement courses and International
Baccalaureate Programs;
B. Career and Technology Education Programs; and
C. Dual enrollment;
4. Chronic absenteeism;
5. Data on discipline and restorative practices; [and]
6. [Access] SCHOOL STAFFING MEASURES, INCLUDING
ACCESS to teachers who hold an Advanced Professional Certificate or have obtained
National Board Certification; AND
7. COMPLETION OF WELL–ROUNDED CURRICULUM
MEASURES THAT ARE INDICATIVE OF ON–TRACK PROGRESS AT KEY TRANSITION
POINTS WITHIN ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION.
(iv) [The] EXCEPT FOR THE COMPLETION OF WELL–ROUNDED
CURRICULUM MEASURES, THE school quality indicators used in subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may not be based on student testing.
(v) 1. The State Board shall establish a composite score that
provides for meaningful differentiation of schools under the school accountability system.
2. The composite score established under subsubparagraph
1 of this subparagraph shall:
A. Include both academic and school quality indicators;
B. Incorporate a methodology that compares schools that
share similar demographic characteristics, including the proportion of economically
disadvantaged students, as defined by the State in accordance with federal law; and
C. Be reported in a manner that states for each score the
individual indicator score that is used to calculate the composite score for each school.
3. The combined total of the academic indicators may not
exceed [65%] 70% of the composite score.
4. The composite score:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 593
A. Shall be calculated numerically in a percentile form; [and]
B. SHALL BE REPORTED SHOWING THE INDIVIDUAL
INDICATORS; AND
[B.] C. May not be reported using a letter grade model.
5. No academic indicator may be weighted as less than 10%
of the total amount of the composite score.
6. No school quality indicator described under this
paragraph may be weighted as less than 10% of the total amount of the composite score.
7. NO ACADEMIC INDICATOR OF PROFICIENCY MAY BE
WEIGHTED AS MORE THAN 20% OF THE COMPOSITE SCORE.
8. Subject to this subparagraph, the final weights of the
academic and school quality indicators shall be determined by the State Board, with
stakeholder input.
(vi) [Of the academic indicators established by the State Board under
subparagraph (v) of this paragraph, one shall be access to or credit for completion of a
well–rounded curriculum that is indicative of on–track progress at key transition points
within elementary and secondary education] WHEN ESTABLISHING OR CALCULATING
THE STATE ACCOUNTABILITY SYSTEM, INDICATORS ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE
BOARD MAY NOT INCORPORATE, REFERENCE, OR RELY ON ANY TEACHER
EVALUATION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, from on or before July 1,
2027, through June 30, 2031, and each July 1 thereafter until July 1, 2031, the State
Department of Education shall report to the State Board of Education and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly on:
(1) any indicator under § 7–203(c)(2)(iii) of the Education Article, as
enacted by Section 1 of this Act, that is not included in the composite score shall be reported
annually to the State Board of Education; and
(2) the correlation between the proportion of students in a school from
low–income households and the school’s accountability rating under the education
accountability program required under § 7–203 of the Education Article, as amended by
Section 1 of this Act, for each of the past 3 years for:
(i) the school’s overall composite score; and
(ii) each indicator used to make up the composite score.
– 3 –

Ch. 593 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 4 –